Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 06.15.370.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“conventional loan” means a loan secured by a first mortgage on unencumbered real property or leasehold estate other than a loan guaranteed or insured by a federal agency;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“financial institution” means a thrift institution, a commercial bank, a trust company, or an insurance company;

“mutual bank” means a mutual savings bank chartered under this chapter;

“thrift institution” means a cooperative bank, a homestead association, a mutual savings and loan association, or a mutual bank.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development“ was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 06.15.380.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Mutual Savings Bank Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 132 SLA 1960)